Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.170

Alleged child abuse or neglect—Use of alcohol or controlled substances as contributing factor—Evaluation.

(1) When, as a result of a report of alleged child abuse or neglect, an investigation is made that includes an in-person contact with the person who is alleged to have committed the abuse or neglect, there shall be a determination of whether it is probable that the use of alcohol or controlled substances is a contributing factor to the alleged abuse or neglect.

(2) The department shall provide appropriate training for persons who conduct the investigations under subsection (1) of this section. The training shall include methods of identifying indicators of abuse of alcohol or controlled substances.

(3) If a determination is made under subsection (1) of this section that there is probable cause to believe abuse of alcohol or controlled substances has contributed to the child abuse or neglect, the department shall, within available funds, cause a comprehensive chemical dependency evaluation to be made of the person or persons so identified. The evaluation shall be conducted by a physician or persons certified under rules adopted by the department to make such evaluation. The department shall perform the duties assigned under this section within existing personnel resources.

[ 1997 c 386 s 48.]